Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,122
Home services; inspections.

Agents of the department may make operation inspections in the homes of clients if such inspections are limited to the activities, procedures, and materials of the licensee providing home services.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 122;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,161;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 384.